Utah statutes.
58-22-601.   Seal -- Design and implementation.

Every professional engineer, professional land surveyor, or professional structural engineer shall have a seal, the design and implementation of which shall be established by rule by the division in collaboration with the board.



Enacted by Chapter 259, 1996 General Session

